Utah statutes.
10-2-706.   Taxes to meet municipal obligations.
The court shall have power to wind down the affairs of the municipality, to
dispose of its property as provided by law, and to make provisions for the
payment of all indebtedness thereof and for the performance of its contracts
and obligations, and shall order such taxes levied from time to time as may be
requisite therefore, which the county legislative body shall levy against the
property within the municipality. The taxes shall be collected by the county
treasurer in the manner for collecting other property taxes and shall be paid
out under the orders of the court, and the surplus, if any, shall be paid into
the school fund for the district in which the taxes were levied. All municipal
property remaining after the winding down of the affairs of the municipality,
shall be transferred to the board of education of such school district, which
board hereby is empowered to enforce all claims for the same and to have the
use of all property so vesting.
